Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 11 Child Care Council

49-5-240 through 49-5-244.

Reserved. Redesignated by Ga. L. 2004, p. 645, § 15, effective October 1, 2004.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 645, § 15, effective October 1, 2004, redesignated former Code Sections 49-5-240 through 49-5-244 as present Code Sections 20-1A-60 through 20-1A-64, respectively.